District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2707

Exemptions from chapter.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 7
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
July 31, 1939, 53 Stat. 1143, ch. 398
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2407.
1973 Ed., § 2-1507.